Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.073

Communication plan status report—Life safety information communication report.

(1) Beginning December 1, 2019, the Washington military department emergency management division must submit a report every five years to the relevant committees of the legislature containing the status of communication plans produced under RCW 38.52.070(3)(a).

(2) The emergency management division of the Washington military department must provide the legislature an annual report on instances of emergency or disaster in which communication of life safety information was technologically infeasible, as reported to the department pursuant to RCW 38.52.070(4). When potential technology solutions exist, the report must include recommendations and an estimate of resources required to remedy the infeasibility. The first annual report is due December 1, 2019.

[ 2017 c 312 s 5.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2017 c 312: See note following RCW 38.52.580.